South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5073.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Public school grading practices SECTION 1.    Article 1, Chapter 29, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-29-250.    (A) No public school district or public school may adopt any type of grading system that requires a teacher to assign a minimum grade or score that exceeds the student's actual performance on required assignments. If a school district is found to be in violation of this section, the State Department of Education shall withhold ten percent of the school district's State Aid to Classroom funding. (B) In order for a student to be eligible to participate in a district-approved credit recovery course as defined in the South Carolina Uniform Grading Policy, a student must have submitted all required assignments for the course in a manner consistent with district policies for timely submission of student work. (C) In order for a student to be eligible to participate in a district-approved content recovery program as defined in the South Carolina Uniform Grading Policy, a student must have completed all required assignments for the relevant subset of the course in a manner consistent with district policies for timely submission of student work. (D) Public school districts shall not require the inclusion of student performance on the formative assessments required in Section 59-18-310(D) or on any district-selected benchmark assessment in calculating a student's final grade in any course or subject. District selected benchmark assessments may only be used as formative assessments for instructional purposes and shall not factor into a student's course grade unless the assessment is developed or directly accessible to the course instructor prior to administration of the assessment and exclusively measures content that has previously been taught in the course. These provisions do not apply to end of course assessments. This section does not prohibit a district from requiring administration of benchmark assessments for the purpose of informing and improving instructional practices through evaluation and monitoring of student mastery of state academic standards. Student results on district-developed benchmark assessments must be made available in a timely fashion to educators, students, and parents after administration of the assessment. (E) Prior to the start of the 2026-2027 School Year, the State Board of Education is directed to establish a task force comprised of three superintendents, principals, teachers, representatives of public school boards each, and three high school students to evaluate potential revisions to the Uniform Grading Policy in order to enhance the utility of grades in evaluating college and career readiness, ensure high school grade point averages are meaningful indicators of academic achievement, and reduce the need for and use of credit recovery and content recovery programs. The task force shall make recommendations to the board for potential revisions in areas including, but not limited to, the use of term weighting in calculating final student grades, the method of awarding quality points on the basis of unique numeric final course averages when calculating student grade point averages, and the use of a 100-point grading scale. The task force shall report its findings to the State Board of Education before June 1, 2027. The State Board of Education shall consider the findings and adopt any updates to the Uniform Grading Policy. Public school districts shall implement any updates to the Uniform Grading Policy by no later than the 2028-2029 School Year. At a minimum thereafter, the uniform grading policy should be reviewed and updated every seven years. (F) Nothing in this section shall restrain a public school district from adopting policies regarding credit or content recovery. (G) For the purpose of this section, the use of "public school district" shall include charter school districts and the use of "public school" shall include charter schools. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect July 1, 2026. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________